Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2025.01
Joint entity or joint public agency; reporting of budget; filing required.

Any joint entity or joint public agency created to fulfill the purposes of the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency Act shall comply with the Municipal Proprietary Function Act for purposes of reporting its budgets. Proprietary budget statements for the joint entity or joint public agency shall be placed on file with the office of the municipal clerk of each member which is a municipality as required by the Municipal Proprietary Function Act and with the county clerk of each member which is a county.

Laws 1994, LB 1207, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 57.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Municipal Proprietary Function Act, see section 18-2801.